Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2707.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; SEXUALLY EXPLOITED YOUTH AND YOUTH AT RISK OF SEXUAL EXPLOITATION.new text end new text begin $11,125,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $11,125,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for sexually exploited youth or youth at risk of sexual exploitation under Minnesota Statutes, section 256K.47. Of these amounts, at least $9,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $9,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 must be for sustaining and expanding street outreach, emergency shelter, regional navigators, and housing for sexually exploited youth or youth at risk of sexual exploitation. new text end